Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.946

Fire services trust fund.

The fire services trust fund is created in the state treasury. All receipts designated by the legislature shall be deposited in the fund. Appropriations from the fund may be made exclusively for the purposes specified in *RCW 43.63A.377.

[ 1991 c 135 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.63A.375.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.63A.377 was recodified as RCW 43.43.948 pursuant to 1995 c 369 s 69, effective July 1, 1995.

Intent—1991 c 135: "It is necessary for the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of Washington that fire code enforcement, public education on fire prevention, fire training for fire and emergency response personnel, and administration of these activities be funded in a dependable manner. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to establish a fund for these purposes." [ 1991 c 135 s 1.]

Effective date—1991 c 135: "This act is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 135 s 8.]

Severability—1991 c 135: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 c 135 s 9.]